Ohio, session 136, HB808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1349.08, 1349.081, 1349.082, 1349.083, 1349.084, 1349.085, 5119.65, 5119.651, 5119.652, and 5119.653 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1349.08. As used in sections 1349.08 to 1349.085 of the Revised Code: (A) "Addictive feed" means a web site, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, in which multiple pieces of media generated or shared by users of a web site, online service, online application, or mobile application, either concurrently or sequentially, are recommended, selected, or prioritized for display to a user based, in whole or in part, on information associated with the user or the user's device, unless any of the following conditions apply: (1) The recommendation, prioritization, or selection is based on information that is not persistently associated with the user or user's device and does not concern the user's previous interactions with media generated or shared by other users. (2) The recommendation, prioritization, or selection is based on user-selected privacy or accessibility settings or technical information concerning the user's device. (3) The user expressly and unambiguously requested the specific media, media by the author, creator, or poster of media the user has subscribed to, or media shared by users to a page or group the user has subscribed to, provided that the media is not recommended, selected, or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information associated with the user or the user's device that is not otherwise permissible under law. (4) The user expressly and unambiguously requested that specific media, media by a specified author, creator, or poster of media the user has subscribed to, or media shared by users to a page or group the user has subscribed to, be blocked, prioritized or deprioritized for display, provided that the media is not recommended, selected, or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information associated with the user or the user's device that is not otherwise permissible under law. (5) The media are direct and private communications. (6) The media are recommended, selected, or prioritized only in response to a specific search inquiry by the user. (7) The media recommended, selected, or prioritized for display is exclusively next in a pre-existing sequence from the same author, creator, poster, or source. (8) The recommendation, prioritization, or selection is necessary to comply with sections 1349.08 to 1349.085 of the Revised Code and any regulations adopted pursuant to those sections. (B)(1) "Addictive social media platform" means a web site, online service, online application, or mobile application that primarily serves as a medium for covered users to interact with media generated by other users and which offers or provides covered users an addictive feed, push notifications, autoplay, infinite scroll, or like counts as a significant part of the services provided by such web site, online service, online application, or mobile application. (2) "Addictive social media platform" does not include any service or application that offers the features described in division (B)(1) of this section for a valid purpose unrelated to prolong use of such platform, as determined by the attorney general. (C) "Autoplay" means when a piece of media is automatically played without any manual input from a covered user. (D) "Covered operator" means any person, business, or other legal entity who operates or provides an addictive social media platform. (E) "Covered user" means a user of a web site, online service, online application, or mobile application in this state, not acting as an operator, or agent or affiliate of the operator of such web site, online service, online application or mobile application or any portion thereof. (F) "Infinite scroll" means when any feed or landing page automatically loads and displays additional media at the bottom of such feed or landing page without any manual input from a covered user. (G) "Like counts" means the quantification and public display of positive votes, including those expressed via a heart or thumbs-up icon, attached to a piece of media generated by a covered user. (H) "Media" means any text, image, or video. (I) "Push notification" means an alert generated by an addictive social media platform for a covered user when such platform is not in use, but excludes the following notifications: (1) Those that have been expressly and unambiguously requested by a covered user; (2) Any related to the user's health or safety, including information related to data security or threats; (3) Those that serve a public purpose; (4) Those related to a user-selected setting or technical information concerning a user's device; (5) Any that are required to comply with state, federal, or local laws or regulations; (6) Any required to operate the addictive social media platform; (7) Any that serve a valid purpose unrelated to prolonging use of such platform, as determined by the attorney general. (J) "Warning label" means the label designed by the director of behavioral health under section 5119.65 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1349.081. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, a covered operator shall not make any addictive social media platform available to covered users in this state. (B) A covered operator may provide an addictive social media platform to covered users in this state if a warning label is displayed each time a covered user accesses the social media platform. Sec. 1349.082. A covered operator shall not do any of the following: (A) Include a warning label exclusively in an addictive social media platform's terms of service; (B) Obscure the visibility or prominence of a warning label, including the inclusion of any extraneous text not prescribed by the director of behavioral health under section 5119.652 of the Revised Code; (C) Display a warning label at a point in a covered user's use of the platform or for a duration other than what was prescribed by the director of behavioral health under section 5119.652 of the Revised Code; (D) Deploy any other design feature or mechanism which intentionally serves to inhibit or subvert the warning label from being displayed as prescribed by the director of behavioral health under section 5119.652 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1349.083. A covered operator shall not withhold, degrade, lower the quality, or increase the price of any product, service, or feature to a covered user other then what is necessary to comply with sections 1349.08 to 1349.085 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1349.084. (A) Whenever it appears to the attorney general, either upon complaint or on the attorney general's own behalf, that a person, within or outside the state, has violated sections 1349.081 to 1349.083 of the Revised Code, the attorney general may do the following: (1) Bring an action or special proceeding to enjoin any violation of those sections; (2) Request civil penalties of up to five thousand dollars per violation; (3) Recover, on behalf of the covered user, any damages caused directly or indirectly by the violation. (B) The attorney general may also seek any of the following: (1) Restitution of any money or property obtained directly or indirectly from the violation; (2) Disgorgement of any profits or gains obtained directly or indirectly from the violation; (3) Any such other and further relief as the court may deem proper, including preliminary relief. Sec. 1349.085. The attorney general shall maintain a publically accessible web site for people to report complaints, information, or referrals of a covered operator's or addictive social media platform's noncompliance with sections 1349.08 to 1349.085 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.65. (A) As used in this section and sections 5119.651 to 5119.653 of the Revised Code, "addictive social media platform," "covered operator," and "covered user" have the same meanings as in section 1349.08 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of behavioral health shall, in consultation with the department of health and the department of education and workforce, design the text for a warning label for addictive social media platforms, as required under section 1349.081 of the Revised Code, based upon a review of medical and sociological research that is available at the time of the initial design of the label, including from government publications and peer-reviewed scholarly articles. (C) When determining the warning label's text, the director shall review and consider the following: (1) Findings related to the impact of addictive social media platforms on covered users' social, emotional, and physical health, including any particularized findings for users under the age of eighteen. (2) Any correlations between prolonged use of addictive social media platforms and the following: (a) Anxiety; (b) Depression; (c) Body dysmorphia; (d) Low self-esteem; (e) Disruptions in sleep patterns; (f) Educational outcomes; (g) Changes in cognitive development; (h) Analytical skills; (i) Contextual thinking; (j) Attention span; (k) Memory formation; (l) Any other physical or behavioral patterns unveiled by such available research. Sec. 5119.651. The director of behavioral health may annually update the text of the warning label developed under section 5119.65 of the Revised Code to reflect any changing developments in this state of available research described in that section. Sec. 5119.652. The director of behavioral health shall adopt rules to do the following: (A) Establish a process for the director to annually update the text of the warning label pursuant to section 5119.651 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Determine the following specifications for the warning label: (a) The point in a covered user's use of an addictive social media platform the warning label will appear; (b) The frequency that the label will appear during the covered user's use of the platform; (c) The length of time the label will remain prominently displayed on the platform. (2) The director shall use the following factors when determining the specifications described in division (B)(1) of the section: (a) The warning label's effectiveness; (b) The duration of user time on an addictive social media platform that may be associated with particular harms, including harms associated with certain times of the day; (c) User response; (d) Changes in user behavior related to the label; (e) Any other factor the director deems relevant. Sec. 5119.653. (A) The director of behavioral health shall compile an annual report summarizing the following: (1) The efforts undertaken by the department of behavioral health to study the available research described in section 5119.65 of the Revised Code and how those efforts informed the regulations prescribing the design, temporal appearance, and duration of the addictive social media platform warning label; (2) Any changes to the warning label's text compared to prior years; (3) Any recommended legislative changes, including statutory updates related to the inclusion of additional design features deployed by covered operators that are designed to prolong use of an addictive social media platform. (B) The report described in division (A) of this section shall be posted on the department's web site in a clear and conspicuous manner and shall be submitted to the following: (1) The governor; (2) The president of the senate; (3) The speaker of the house of representatives; (4) The chairpersons of any legislative committee related to education, mental health, internet and technology, and science and technology.